lez_noun.lexd
PATTERNS
(NounStem [<n>:] ((NounPlural?) | (NounErg | NounErgPlural)))[^[Decl1,Decl2,Decl3,Decl4,Decl5],^[Back,NonBack,Labial]]
(NounStem [<n>:] (NounErg | NounErgPlural))[^[Decl1,Decl2,Decl3,Decl4,Decl5],^[Back,NonBack,Labial]] (NounInfl) | (NounInflEssive (Elative | Directive)?)

LEXICON NounInfl
<gen>:н
<dat>:з

LEXICON NounErg[Decl1]
<erg>:a[Back]
<erg>:е[NonBack]

LEXICON NounErg[Decl2]
<erg>:ди

LEXICON NounErg[Decl3]
<erg>:уни[Back]
<erg>:ини[NonBack]
<erg>:уьни[NonBack,Labial]

LEXICON NounErg[Decl4]
<erg>:ади[Back]
<erg>:еди[NonBack]

LEXICON NounErg[Decl5]
<erg>:ра[Back]
<erg>:ре[NonBack]

LEXICON NounErgPlural
<pl><erg>:ари[Back]
<pl><erg>:ери[NonBack]

LEXICON Elative
<elative>:ай

LEXICON Directive
<directive>:ди

LEXICON NounInflEssive
<ad><essive>:в
<post><essive>:хъ
<sub><essive>:к
<in><essive>:а 
<super><essive>:л

LEXICON NounPlural
<pl>:ар[Back]
<pl>:ер[NonBack]

LEXICON NounStem
аба[Decl2,Back] # халат
агъ[Decl2,Back] # бязь
ар[Decl2,Back] # рев
арабачи[Decl2,Back] # аробщик
арх[Decl3,Back] # борозда
багъ[Decl2,Back] # сад
багъ[Decl3,Back] # фитиль
бегьер[Decl2,NonBack] # урожай
бейт[Decl3,NonBack] # строфа
бицил[Decl2,NonBack] # чугунный котел
болт[Decl3,Back] # болт
бурж[Decl3,Back] # долг
бягьс[Decl3,NonBack] # спор
вак[Decl1,Back] # свинья
вал[Decl1,Back] # куст
ван[Decl2,Back] # голос
вар[Decl2,Back] # ворота
варз[Decl5,Back] # луна
ват[Decl3,Back] # катушка
вах[Decl1,Back] # сестра
верг[Decl4,NonBack] # крапива
верч[Decl5,NonBack] # курица
ветI[Decl5,NonBack] # комар
викI[Decl3,NonBack] # ярмо
винт[Decl3,NonBack] # винт
вождь[Decl3,Back] # вождь
гав[Decl5,Back] # тур
гам[Decl3,Back] # кавер
гар[Decl1,Back] # ветер
гел[Decl1,NonBack] # след
гиг[Decl3,NonBack] # ось
гьал[Decl2,Back] # состояние
гьарф[Decl3,Back] # буква
гьер[Decl1,NonBack] # баран
гьерт[Decl3,NonBack] # пояс брюк
гьисс[Decl2,NonBack] # чувство
гьуьр[Decl3,NonBack,Labial] # раздражение
гьуьлягь[Decl2,Back] # змея
гьуьм[Decl4,NonBack] # мгла
гъал[Decl3,Back] # нитка
гъар[Decl2,Back] # борона
гъед[Decl5,NonBack] # козленок
гъел[Decl2,NonBack] # сани
гъер[Decl4,NonBack] # слюна
гъуьчI[Decl5,NonBack] # моль
дава[Decl2,Back] # лекарство
дакI[Decl1,Back] # окошко
дуьгуь[Decl2,Back] # рис
дуьньйа[Decl2,Back] #  # мир
жанг[Decl3,Back] # иней
жем[Decl3,NonBack] # медная кружка
жив[Decl4,NonBack] # снег
жинс[Decl3,NonBack] # род
жуьт[Decl3,NonBack,Labial] # чета, пара
зегьмет[Decl2,NonBack] # труд
иви[Decl2,NonBack] # кровь
ирс[Decl3,NonBack] # наследство
ич[Decl3,NonBack] # яблоко
йикь[Decl1,NonBack] # траур, плач
йиге[Decl2,NonBack] # напильник
йирф[Decl3,NonBack] # деревянная лопата
йиф[Decl1,NonBack] # ночь
капI[Decl3,Back] # молитва
кард[Decl5,Back] # сокол
каф[Decl4,Back] # пена
кач[Decl1,Back] # сука
каш[Decl1,Back] # голод
кашу[Decl2,Back] # лента, плетеный ремень
кек[Decl1,NonBack] # ноготь
кем[Decl3,NonBack] # теплый носок
кеф[Decl3,NonBack] # удовольствие
ким[Decl1,NonBack] # годекан
киф[Decl3,NonBack] # коса (женская)
кицI[Decl1,NonBack] # собака
ккIал[Decl2,Back] # камешек
ккIам[Decl2,Back] # клещ
кьар[Decl4,Back] #  # грязь
# къари[Decl2,Back] # свекровь
къаз[Decl5,Back] # гусь
къаш[Decl2,Back] # драгоценный камень
къвал[Decl1,Back] # бок
къиб[Decl1,NonBack] # желтая пряжа
къиб[Decl4,NonBack] # желток
къиб[Decl5,NonBack] # лягушка
къир[Decl4,NonBack] # смола
къул[Decl2,Back] # раб
къум[Decl4,Back] # песок
къуьр[Decl1,NonBack] # заяц
кьвал[Decl1,Back] # обрыв
кьвех[Decl1,NonBack] # пах
кьеж[Decl1,NonBack] # влага
кьел[Decl1,NonBack] # соль
кьвер[Decl1,NonBack] # русло
кьин[Decl1,NonBack] # клятва
кьун[Decl1,Back] # козел
кьур[Decl1,Back] # сухость
кьуш[Decl1,Back] # жир
кьуьнт[Decl1,NonBack] # локоть
кьуьк[Decl3,NonBack,Labial] # вилы
кьуьл[Decl3,NonBack,Labial] # танец
кIатI[Decl1,Back] # ларь
кIукI[Decl1,Back] # верх, вершина
кIумп[Decl3,Back] # пробка
кIуф[Decl1,Back] # морда
кур[Decl3,Back] # чашка
лаз[Decl1,Back] # белок
лекь[Decl5,NonBack] # орел
лиф[Decl5,NonBack] # голубь
лув[Decl1,Back] # крыло
ляй[Decl2,Back] # ястреб
марф[Decl4,Back] # дождь
мурк[Decl4,Back] # дождь
муртI[Decl1,Back] # внутренний угол
мух[Decl1,Back] # ячмень
нагъв[Decl4,Back] # мелкая солома
наз[Decl2,Back] # кокетство
нек[Decl4,NonBack] # молоко
нет[Decl5,NonBack] # вошь
нуькI[Decl5,NonBack] # воробей
раб[Decl3,Back] # иголка
рагъ # солнце
ракьуцI[Decl2,Back] # шлак
палчух # грязь
пIатI[Decl5,Back] # белая утка
пел[Decl1,NonBack] # лоб
полк[Decl3,Back] # полк
птул[Decl2,Back] # правнук
пул[Decl2,Back] # деньги
пут[Decl3,Back] # пуд
сал[Decl1,Back] # огород
син[Decl1,NonBack] # хребет
сир[Decl2,NonBack] # тайна
сорт[Decl3,Back] # сорт
сят[Decl2,Back] # час, часы
тагв[Decl4,Back] # сурепка
тай[Decl2,Back] # жеребенок
тар[Decl2,Back] # дерево
тар[Decl1,Back] # дерево
тарс[Decl3,Back] # урок
туп[Decl3,Back] # пушка
туьд[Decl3,NonBack,Labial] # горло
тIвар[Decl2,Back] # имя
тIвекв[Decl1,NonBack] # дыра
тIветI[Decl5,NonBack] # муха
тIвехв[Decl1,NonBack] # пятно
уьлен[Decl2,NonBack] # болото
уьфт[Decl3,NonBack,Labial] # свист
фер[Decl2,NonBack] # щель
фикир[Decl2,Back] # мысль
хал[Decl2,Back] # родинка
хар[Decl4,Back] # град
хер[Decl1,NonBack] # рана
хтул[Decl2,Back] # внук
хуз[Decl5,Back] # оса
хьур[Decl1,NonBack] # село
хъач[Decl4,Back] # травка
цен[Decl2,NonBack] # подол
цирк[Decl3,NonBack] # цирк
циф[Decl4,NonBack] # облако, туча
цIвекI[Decl4,NonBack] # мякина
цIегь[Decl5,NonBack] # коза
цIирх[Decl3,NonBack] # узкий кусок материала
цIицI[Decl5,NonBack] # стрекоза
цур[Decl2,Back] # медведь
цуьк[Decl4,NonBack] # цветок
цуьл[Decl2,NonBack] # сноп
чеб[Decl4,NonBack] # глина
чек[Decl3,NonBack] # чек
чиг[Decl4,NonBack] # роса
чил[Decl1,NonBack] # земля, страна
чиргъ[Decl3,NonBack] # заноза
чит[Decl3,NonBack] # ситец
чкал[Decl2,Back] # кора
чIиб[Decl3,NonBack] # пядь
чIул[Decl3,Back] # ремень
чIут[Decl5,Back] # блоха
шем[Decl3,NonBack] # свеча
ших[Decl3,NonBack] # холст
шиш[Decl3,NonBack] # вилка
шутI[Decl5,Back] # клоп
юкI[Decl3,Back] # метр
юргъ[Decl4,NonBack] # ливень
ял[Decl2,Back] # запах
яц[Decl5,Back] # бык
